Louisiana, session 2026, HB553.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:1907(E), (F)(1)(a) and (b), and (G)(1) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§1907. Salaries
* * *
E. The assessors' certification program committee, hereinafter referred to as
the "certification committee", is hereby created to govern the assessors' professional
certification program. The certification committee shall be composed of five eleven
members who shall serve one-year terms and who may be reappointed. The
members shall be appointed as follows:
(1) One member shall be the chairman of the education committee Education
Coordinator of the Louisiana Assessors Association who shall serve as chairman of
the certification committee.
(2) One member Two members shall be appointed by the Louisiana Tax
Commission.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 553 ENROLLED
(3) Two Eight members shall be assessors who have met the requirements
for certification as certified Louisiana assessors (CLA's) or deputy assessors who
have met the Louisiana Assessors' Association requirements for certification as
certified Louisiana deputy assessors who shall be appointed by the president of the
Louisiana Assessors Assessors' Association. The president of the Louisiana
Assessors' Association shall appoint one member from each of the eight Board of
Directors' districts established by the Louisiana Assessors' Association.
(4) One member shall be a deputy assessor who has met the Louisiana
Assessors Association requirements for certification as a certified Louisiana deputy
assessor (CLDA) who shall be appointed by the president of the Louisiana Assessors
Association.
F.(1) The educational requirements for certification shall be as follows:
(a) A passing grade on the examination for the International Association of
Assessing Officers course 1 101-- Fundamentals of Real Property Appraisal.
(b) A passing grade on the examination for the International Association of
Assessing Officers course 2--Income Approach to Valuation or equivalent courses
offered by the Appraisal Institute 400-- Assessment Administration.
* * *
G.(1) Recertification shall be obtained by completing either of the following
requirements:
(a) A minimum of fifty-nine hours of continuing education offered by the
International Association of Assessing Officers or the Appraisal Institute, which
shall include the International Association of Assessing Officers Workshop 151
Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice (USPAP) course, the
Workshop 191 National USPAP Update, or an approved Appraisal Foundation one
or two-day Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice (USPAP) course
and at least one course, thirty hours minimum, on appraisal of property completed
by passing a written examination. The remaining hours shall be selected from
recertification guidelines as adopted by the certification committee. All designees
shall obtain recertification within a five-year period.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 553 ENROLLED
(b) A minimum of seventy-four hours of continuing education offered by the
International Association of Assessing Officers or the Appraisal Institute, which
shall include the International Association of Assessing Officers Workshop 151
Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice (USPAP) course, the
Workshop 191 National USPAP Update, or an approved Appraisal Foundation one
or two-day Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice (USPAP) course
and at least one course, thirty hours minimum, on appraisal of property, for which
no written examination shall be required. The remaining hours shall be selected
from recertification guidelines as adopted by the certification committee. All
designees shall obtain recertification within a five-year period.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.